Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) No city or town may prohibit the installation of sewage grinder pumps for new single-family residences that:(a) Are located below grade of a public sewer line;(b) Are connected to a public or private low-pressure sewer system;(c) Are located where drainage via gravity or other wastewater service alternatives, such as septic tank effluent pumping, are not possible;(d) Must move wastewater vertically;(e) Have a check valve or backflow preventor; and(f) Are consistent with the utility provider's sewer system plan.(2) Sewage grinder pumps installed on private property are owned by the property owner, who is responsible for maintenance and repairs of the equipment. The city or town may accept ownership and maintenance responsibilities of the equipment at its sole discretion. If the property owner fails to complete necessary maintenance or repairs, the sewer provider may make the repairs and invoice the owner for the costs.(3) For purposes of this section:(a) "Sewage grinder pump" means a system connected to a residential building's wastewater system that collects, grinds, and pumps residential sewage into the public sewer system.(b) "Low-pressure sewer system" means a wastewater system that requires pressure from sewage grinder pumps to transport wastewater.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) No code city may prohibit the installation of sewage grinder pumps for new single-family residences that:(a) Are located below grade of a public sewer line;(b) Are connected to a public or private low-pressure sewer system;(c) Are located where drainage via gravity or other wastewater service alternatives, such as septic tank effluent pumping, are not possible;(d) Must move wastewater vertically;(e) Have a check valve or backflow preventor; and(f) Are consistent with the utility provider's sewer system plan.(2) Sewage grinder pumps installed on private property are owned by the property owner, who is responsible for maintenance and repairs of the equipment. The code city may accept ownership and maintenance responsibilities of the equipment at its sole discretion. If the property owner fails to complete necessary maintenance or repairs, the sewer provider may make the repairs and invoice the owner for the costs.(3) For purposes of this section:(a) "Sewage grinder pump" means a system connected to a residential building's wastewater system that collects, grinds, and pumps residential sewage into the public sewer system.(b) "Low-pressure sewer system" means a wastewater system that requires pressure from sewage grinder pumps to transport wastewater.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:(1) No county may prohibit the installation of sewage grinder pumps for new single-family residences that:(a) Are located below grade of a public sewer line;(b) Are connected to a public or private low-pressure sewer system;(c) Are located where drainage via gravity or other wastewater service alternatives, such as septic tank effluent pumping, are not possible;(d) Must move wastewater vertically;(e) Have a check valve or backflow preventor; and(f) Are consistent with the utility provider's sewer system plan.(2) Sewage grinder pumps installed on private property are owned by the property owner, who is responsible for maintenance and repairs of the equipment. The county may accept ownership and maintenance responsibilities of the equipment at its sole discretion. If the property owner fails to complete necessary maintenance or repairs, the sewer provider may make the repairs and invoice the owner for the costs.(3) For purposes of this section:(a) "Sewage grinder pump" means a system connected to a residential building's wastewater system that collects, grinds, and pumps residential sewage into the public sewer system.(b) "Low-pressure sewer system" means a wastewater system that requires pressure from sewage grinder pumps to transport wastewater.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 57.02 RCW to read as follows:(1) No water-sewer district may prohibit the installation of sewage grinder pumps for new single-family residences that:(a) Are located below grade of a public sewer line;(b) Are connected to a public or private low-pressure sewer system;(c) Are located where drainage via gravity or other wastewater service alternatives, such as septic tank effluent pumping, are not possible;(d) Must move wastewater vertically;(e) Have a check valve or backflow preventor; and(f) Are consistent with the utility provider's sewer system plan.(2) Sewage grinder pumps installed on private property are owned by the property owner, who is responsible for maintenance and repairs of the equipment. The water-sewer district may accept ownership and maintenance responsibilities of the equipment at its sole discretion. If the property owner fails to complete necessary maintenance or repairs, the sewer provider may make the repairs and invoice the owner for the costs.(3) For purposes of this section:(a) "Sewage grinder pump" means a system connected to a residential building's wastewater system that collects, grinds, and pumps residential sewage into the public sewer system.(b) "Low-pressure sewer system" means a wastewater system that requires pressure from sewage grinder pumps to transport wastewater.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 54.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) No public utility district may prohibit the installation of sewage grinder pumps for new single-family residences that:(a) Are located below grade of a public sewer line;(b) Are connected to a public or private low-pressure sewer system;(c) Are located where drainage via gravity or other wastewater service alternatives, such as septic tank effluent pumping, are not possible;(d) Must move wastewater vertically;(e) Have a check valve or backflow preventor; and(f) Are consistent with the utility provider's sewer system plan.(2) Sewage grinder pumps installed on private property are owned by the property owner, who is responsible for maintenance and repairs of the equipment. The public utility district may accept ownership and maintenance responsibilities of the equipment at its sole discretion. If the property owner fails to complete necessary maintenance or repairs, the sewer provider may make the repairs and invoice the owner for the costs.(3) For purposes of this section:(a) "Sewage grinder pump" means a system connected to a residential building's wastewater system that collects, grinds, and pumps residential sewage into the public sewer system.(b) "Low-pressure sewer system" means a wastewater system that requires pressure from sewage grinder pumps to transport wastewater.--- END ---